Utah statutes.
54-8a-10.5.   Installation and location of sewer lateral cleanouts -- Records.

(1) (a)  An operator or person installing or replacing a sewer lateral cleanout beginning August 1, 2009 shall install or replace the sewer lateral cleanout in a manner so that the lateral can be located, including:

(i)  house sheets; or

(ii)  electronic markers.

(b)  An operator or person installing a sewer lateral cleanout shall notify the sewer operator of the sewer lateral cleanout location for record keeping purposes.

(2)  Beginning on August 1, 2009, a sewer operator shall maintain records identifying where all new, replaced, or contractor-identified sewer lateral cleanouts are located within the sewer operator's jurisdiction.

(3) (a)  A sewer operator shall provide to an excavator information in the sewer operator's possession pertaining to a sewer lateral cleanout location within the sewer operator's jurisdiction.

(b)  The sewer operator shall provide the information within 48 hours of the excavator's request.

